Rhode Island, session 2025, SB558.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-8-8 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-8 entitled "Burglary and
Breaking and Entering" is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-8-8. Injury or death — Defense.
In the event that any person shall die or shall sustain a personal injury in any way or for
any cause while in the commission of any criminal offense enumerated in §§ 11-8-2 — 11-8-6, or
§ 11-39-2, it shall be rebuttably presumed as a matter of law in any civil or criminal proceeding
that the owner, tenant, or occupier of the place where the offense was committed acted by
reasonable means in self-defense and in the reasonable belief that the person engaged in the
criminal offense was about to inflict great bodily harm or death upon that person or any other
individual lawfully in the place where the criminal offense was committed. There shall be no duty
on the part of an owner, tenant, or occupier to retreat from any person engaged in the commission
of any criminal offense enumerated in §§ 11-8-2 — 11-8-6, or § 11-39-2.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000389
========